Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-327.10
Time requirement.

Except in the case
of an emergency situation, if a pregnant woman is provided with the information
required by section 28-327 less than twenty-four hours before her scheduled
abortion, the physician shall bear the burden of proving that the pregnant
woman had sufficient reflection time, given her age, maturity, emotional state,
and mental capacity, to comprehend and consider such information.

Laws 2010, LB594, § 9.